Nebraska, session 109, LB243.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB243 LB243
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 23-367, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-367 Special sidewalk assessments may be collected in the manner
usual for the collection or foreclosure of county or state taxes against
real estate.
Sec. 2. Original section 23-367, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-